North Carolina, session 2025, HB1087.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Transportation, Division of Aviation, the following amounts in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to Forsyth County for renovation, structural repairs,
modernization, and necessary infrastructure enhancements of hangar facilities at the Smith
Reynolds Airport, according to the following schedule:

Item FY 2026-27
Hangar Facility at 4001 North Liberty Street $11,500,000
Hangar Facility at 3820 North Liberty Street $4,000,000

SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1087-v-1*